Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1301
Recall; filing officer, defined.

For purposes of sections 32-1301 to 32-1309, filing officer means (1) the election commissioner or county clerk for recall of elected officers of cities, villages, counties, irrigation districts, school districts, and hospital districts and (2) the Secretary of State for recall of elected officers of natural resources districts, public power districts, community college areas, educational service units, and metropolitan utilities districts.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 374;

Laws 2003, LB 444, § 9;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 53.